Illinois, session 104th, SB3060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 24B-15 and 24C-15 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/24B-15)7    Sec. 24B-15. Official return of precinct; check of totals; 8retabulation. The precinct return printed by the automatic 9Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology tabulating 10equipment shall include the number of ballots cast and votes 11cast for each candidate and proposition and shall constitute 12the official return of each precinct. In addition to the 13precinct return, the election authority shall provide the 14number of applications for ballots in each precinct, the 15write-in votes, the total number of ballots counted in each 16precinct for each political subdivision and district and the 17number of registered voters in each precinct. However, the 18election authority shall check the totals shown by the 19precinct return and, if there is an obvious discrepancy 20regarding the total number of votes cast in any precinct, 21shall have the ballots for that precinct retabulated to 22correct the return. The procedures for retabulation shall 23apply prior to and after the proclamation is completed;   SB3060- 2 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1however, after the proclamation of results, the election 2authority must obtain a court order to unseal voted ballots 3except for election contests and discovery recounts. In those 4election jurisdictions that use in-precinct counting 5equipment, the certificate of results, which has been prepared 6by the judges of election after the ballots have been 7tabulated, shall be the document used for the canvass of votes 8for such precinct. Whenever a discrepancy exists during the 9canvass of votes between the unofficial results and the 10certificate of results, or whenever a discrepancy exists 11during the canvass of votes between the certificate of results 12and the set of totals which has been affixed to the certificate 13of results, the ballots for that precinct shall be retabulated 14to correct the return. As an additional part of this check 15prior to the proclamation, in those jurisdictions where 16in-precinct counting equipment is used, the election authority 17shall retabulate the total number of votes cast on in 5% of the 18election day equipment used precincts within the election 19jurisdiction, as well as 5% of the voting devices used in early 20voting. The precincts and the voting devices to be retabulated 21shall be selected after election day on a random basis by the 22State Board of Elections, so that every precinct in the 23election jurisdiction and every voting device used in early 24voting and all equipment used on election day in the election 25jurisdiction has an equal mathematical chance of being 26selected. The State Board of Elections shall design a standard   SB3060- 3 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1and scientific random method of selecting the precincts and 2voting devices which are to be retabulated. The State central 3committee chair of each established political party shall be 4given prior written notice of the time and place of the random 5selection procedure and may be represented at the procedure. 6The retabulation shall consist of counting the ballots which 7were originally counted and shall not involve any 8determination of which ballots were, in fact, properly 9counted. The ballots from the precincts selected for the 10retabulation shall remain at all times under the custody and 11control of the election authority and shall be transported and 12retabulated by the designated staff of the election authority.13    As part of the retabulation, the election authority shall 14test the computer program in the selected precincts and on the 15selected early voting devices. The test shall be conducted by 16processing a preaudited group of ballots marked to record a 17predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on 18each public question, and shall include for each office one or 19more ballots which have votes in excess of the number allowed 20by law to test the ability of the equipment and the marking 21device to reject such votes. If any error is detected, the 22cause shall be determined and corrected, and an errorless 23count shall be made prior to the official canvass and 24proclamation of election results.25    The State Board of Elections, the State's Attorney and 26other appropriate law enforcement agencies, the county chair   SB3060- 4 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1of each established political party and qualified civic 2organizations shall be given prior written notice of the time 3and place of the retabulation and may be represented at the 4retabulation.5    The results of this retabulation shall be treated in the 6same manner and have the same effect as the results of the 7discovery procedures set forth in Section 22-9.1 of this Code. 8Upon completion of the retabulation, the election authority 9shall print a comparison of the results of the retabulation 10with the original precinct return printed by the automatic 11tabulating equipment. The comparison shall be done for each 12precinct and for each early voting device selected for testing 13and for each office voted upon within that precinct or on that 14voting device, and the comparisons shall be open to the 15public. Upon completion of the retabulation, the returns shall 16be open to the public.17(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 18    (10 ILCS 5/24C-15)19    Sec. 24C-15. Official return of precinct; check of totals; 20audit. The precinct return printed by the Direct Recording 21Electronic Voting System tabulating equipment shall include 22the number of ballots cast and votes cast for each candidate 23and public question and shall constitute the official return 24of each precinct. In addition to the precinct return, the 25election authority shall provide the number of applications   SB3060- 5 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1for ballots in each precinct, the total number of ballots and 2vote by mail ballots counted in each precinct for each 3political subdivision and district and the number of 4registered voters in each precinct. However, the election 5authority shall check the totals shown by the precinct return 6and, if there is an obvious discrepancy regarding the total 7number of votes cast in any precinct, shall have the ballots 8for that precinct audited to correct the return. The 9procedures for this audit shall apply prior to and after the 10proclamation is completed; however, after the proclamation of 11results, the election authority must obtain a court order to 12unseal voted ballots or voting devices except for election 13contests and discovery recounts. The certificate of results, 14which has been prepared and signed by the judges of election 15after the ballots have been tabulated, shall be the document 16used for the canvass of votes for such precinct. Whenever a 17discrepancy exists during the canvass of votes between the 18unofficial results and the certificate of results, or whenever 19a discrepancy exists during the canvass of votes between the 20certificate of results and the set of totals reflected on the 21certificate of results, the ballots for that precinct shall be 22audited to correct the return.23    Prior to the proclamation, the election authority shall 24test the voting devices and equipment on in 5% of the election 25day equipment used precincts within the election jurisdiction, 26as well as 5% of the voting devices used in early voting. The   SB3060- 6 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1precincts and the voting devices to be tested shall be 2selected after election day on a random basis by the State 3Board of Elections, so that every precinct and every device 4used in early voting and all equipment used on election day in 5the election jurisdiction has an equal mathematical chance of 6being selected. The State Board of Elections shall design a 7standard and scientific random method of selecting the 8precincts and voting devices that are to be tested. The State 9central committee chair of each established political party 10shall be given prior written notice of the time and place of 11the random selection procedure and may be represented at the 12procedure.13    The test shall be conducted by counting the votes marked 14on the permanent paper record of each ballot cast in the tested 15precinct printed by the voting system at the time that each 16ballot was cast and comparing the results of this count with 17the results shown by the certificate of results prepared by 18the Direct Recording Electronic Voting System in the test 19precinct. The election authority shall test count these votes 20either by hand or by using an automatic tabulating device 21other than a Direct Recording Electronic voting device that 22has been approved by the State Board of Elections for that 23purpose and tested before use to ensure accuracy. The election 24authority shall print the results of each test count. If any 25error is detected, the cause shall be determined and 26corrected, and an errorless count shall be made prior to the   SB3060- 7 -LRB104 16955 SPS 30369 b1official canvass and proclamation of election results. If an 2errorless count cannot be conducted and there continues to be 3difference in vote results between the certificate of results 4produced by the Direct Recording Electronic Voting System and 5the count of the permanent paper records or if an error was 6detected and corrected, the election authority shall 7immediately prepare and forward to the appropriate canvassing 8board a written report explaining the results of the test and 9any errors encountered and the report shall be made available 10for public inspection.11    The State Board of Elections, the State's Attorney and 12other appropriate law enforcement agencies, the county chair 13of each established political party and qualified civic 14organizations shall be given prior written notice of the time 15and place of the test and may be represented at the test.16    The results of this post-election test shall be treated in 17the same manner and have the same effect as the results of the 18discovery procedures set forth in Section 22-9.1 of this Code.19(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.)